Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,155
Declaratory judgments; review.

All orders, judgments and decrees under sections 25-21,149 to 25-21,164 may be reviewed as other orders, judgments and decrees.

Laws 1929, c. 75, § 7, p. 258;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,146;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,155.

Determinations of factual issues in a declaratory judgment action will not be disturbed on appeal unless they are clearly wrong. Beatrice Nat. Bank v. Southeast Neb. Co-op, 230 Neb. 671, 432 N.W.2d 842 (1988).

Declaratory judgment decrees may be reviewed in the Supreme Court as are other decrees. OB-GYN v. Blue Cross, 219 Neb. 199, 361 N.W.2d 550 (1985).

Examination of reviewing court will be confined to questions determined by trial court. Lickert v. City of Omaha, 144 Neb. 75, 12 N.W.2d 644 (1944).